AnimRaNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimRaStem;


LEXICON AnimRaStem
ඌර AnimRaNoun;
වදුර AnimRaNoun;


LEXICON AnimRaNoun

ැ+N+Nom+Sg:ා #;
ැ+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ො #;
ැ+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ෝ #;
ැ+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:න් #;
ැ+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #;
ැ+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ාව #;
ැ+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:න්ව #;
ැ+N+Dat+Sg:ාට #;
ැ+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:න්ට #;
ැ+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ගෙන් #;
ැ+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ාගෙන් #;
ැ+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:න්ගෙන් #;
ැ+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගෙ #;
ැ+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ගෙ #;
ැ+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගේ #;
